Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Penalties

118.990.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]

118.995.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

118.136

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

If the Secretary of State violates any of the provisions of subsection (4) of KRS

118.215

, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates subsection (5) of KRS

118.176

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

If any county clerk violates any of the provisions of subsection (5) of KRS

118.305

, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 156; 1978, ch. 384, § 562, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 100, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 48, § 59, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 366, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90) This section was amended
by two 1990 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled
together.